Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-418
Fresh pursuit; section, how construed.

Section 29-416 shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be lawful.

Laws 1937, c. 70, § 3, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-418;

R.S.1943, § 29-418.